Alabama, session 2026rs, HB129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 34-19-16, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§34-19-16
(a) A licensed midwife may provide midwifery care in
the setting of the client's choice, except a hospital.
(b) A licensed midwife shall ensure that the client has
Page 1

(b) A licensed midwife shall ensure that the client has
HB129 INTRODUCED
signed a midwife disclosure form provided by the board
indicating receipt of a written statement that includes all of
the following information:
(1) A description of the licensed midwife's education,
training, and experience in midwifery.
(2) Antepartum, intrapartum, and postpartum conditions
requiring medical referral, transfer of care, and transport to
a hospital.
(3) A plan for medical referral, transfer of care, and
transport of the client or newborn or both when indicated by
specific antepartum, intrapartum, or postpartum conditions.
(4) Instructions for filing a complaint against a
licensed midwife.
(5) A statement that the licensed midwife must comply
with the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act.
(6) The status of a licensed midwife's professional
liability insurance coverage.
(7) References to current evidence regarding the safety
of midwifery care in out-of-hospital settings, including a
copy of the most recent statement by the American Congress of
Obstetricians and Gynecologists on home birth.
(c) A licensed midwife shall ensure that the client has
signed an informed consent form provided by the board.
(d) For screening purposes only, a licensed midwife may
order routine antepartum and postpartum laboratory analyses to
be performed by a licensed laboratory.
(e) After a client has secured the services of a
Page 2

(e) After a client has secured the services of a
HB129 INTRODUCED
licensed midwife, the licensed midwife shall document an
emergency care plan on a form provided by the board.
(f) A licensed midwife shall determine the progress of
labor and, when birth is imminent, shall be available until
delivery is accomplished.
(g) A licensed midwife shall remain with the client
during the postpartal period until the conditions of the
client and newborn are stabilized.
(h) A licensed midwife shall instruct the client
regarding the requirements of the administration of eye
ointment ordered by the Alabama Department of Public Health
pursuant to Section 22-20-2.
(i) A licensed midwife shall instruct the client
regarding the requirements of administration of newborn health
screening ordered by the Alabama Department of Public Health
pursuant to Section 22-20-3.
(j) A licensed midwife shall file a birth certificate
for each birth in accordance with the requirements of Section
22-9A-7.
(k) A licensed midwife shall collect clinical data
under the Midwives Alliance of North America Statistics
Project for each client who initiates care and shall submit a
copy of the clinical data collected for each consenting client
to the board upon request.
(l) A licensed midwife shall report to the Alabama
Department of Public Health pursuant to Chapter 11A, of Title
22, and any other law that requires hospitals or physicians to
report to the Alabama Department of Public Health.
Page 3

report to the Alabama Department of Public Health.
HB129 INTRODUCED
(m) A licensed midwife shall provide all information
required to be provided to new mothers pursuant to Section
22-20-3.1, and all information required to be provided to new
mothers before discharge by hospitals, as defined in Section
22-21-20.
(n) A licensed midwife shall order and may administer
those tests provided in Section 22-20-3 and any rule adopted
by the State Board of Health pursuant to that section relating
to the newborn screening program, to all neonates in his or
her care.
(o) A licensed midwife may order and administer a
urinalysis or blood glucose test as indicated."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4